Hawaii statutes.
§287-2 Administrator to administer chapter;
appeal to circuit court. (a) The administrator shall administer and
enforce this chapter and make rules and regulations consistent herewith and
necessary for its administration and shall provide for hearings upon request of
any person aggrieved by orders or acts of the administrator under this
chapter. The rules and regulations shall be as nearly uniform throughout the
State as the circumstances permit, but the fact of nonuniformity shall not of
itself be sufficient to make unenforceable any rule or regulation, otherwise
lawful, promulgated hereunder.

(b) Any order or act of any administrator
pursuant to the authority given by this chapter or by rules or regulations
hereunder, shall be subject to appeal to the circuit court of the circuit in
which the order or act has been entered or done, which shall have jurisdiction
to affirm, vacate, and modify, in whole or in part, any such order or act. Any
person aggrieved may file an appeal therefrom in the office of the clerk of the
circuit court within thirty days after the effective date of the order or act.
The appeal shall not operate to suspend the order or act unless for cause
satisfactory to the court and upon such conditions as may be imposed by the
court, the court shall otherwise order. The administrator upon service of a
copy of the appeal shall forthwith transmit to the clerk of court a transcript
of the papers filed with the administrator and a certified transcript of the
evidence, if any, adduced. Upon the filing of the transcript, the appeal shall
be at issue, and upon the application of either party, may be advanced and
assigned for hearing at the earliest possible date to determine whether the
action of the administrator is in accordance with law. The prosecuting officer
and the legal advisor of the county shall render assistance to the
administrator upon the administrator's request in enforcing and carrying out
this chapter and in prosecuting and defending proceedings hereunder. [L 1949, c
393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-81; HRS §287-2; am L 1980, c 84, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

Rules of Court

Appeal to circuit court, see HRCP rule 72.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next